Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.380

Consumer/contractor awareness of chapter.

(1) The department shall use reasonable means, including working cooperatively with construction industry, financial institution, local government, consumer, media, and other interested organizations and individuals, to increase:

(a) Consumer awareness of the requirements of this chapter and the methods available to consumers to protect themselves against loss; and

(b) Contractor awareness of the obligations imposed on contractors by this chapter.

(2) The department shall accomplish the tasks listed in this section within existing resources, including but not limited to fees charged under RCW 18.27.075.

[ 2001 c 159 s 12.]